Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.223

Payment of inspection fee—Due at inspection—Lien—Late fee.

(1) Any inspection fee shall be paid to the department by the owner or person in possession of the livestock unless the inspection is requested by the purchaser and then the fee shall be paid by the purchaser.

(2) Except as provided by rule, the inspection fee is due and payable at the time inspection is performed and shall be paid upon billing by the department and, if not, constitutes a prior lien on the cattle or cattle hides or horses or horse hides inspected until the fee is paid.

(3) A late fee of one and one-half percent per month shall be assessed on the unpaid balance against persons more than thirty days in arrears.

[ 2003 c 326 s 25.]